District of Columbia statutes.
6-506

Penalties.

Violations of any provision of this chapter, including the implementing regulations, are punishable by the following penalties:

(1)

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be punishable by a fine of not more than $300 for each day of the violation, or imprisoned for not more than 30 days, or both.

(2)

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be liable to the District of Columbia for any and all consequential damages resulting from the violation, in addition to related costs and attorney fees.

(3)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

May 26, 1976, D.C. Law 1-64, § 6A
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 38, 38 DCR 314
Civil infractions, administrative review, appeals, see § 2-1803.01.
1981 Ed., § 5-306.